Indiana, session 2026, SB108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-177 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 177. (a) "Shelter", for
purposes of IC 12-20, means a house, a mobile home, an apartment, a
group of rooms, or a single room that is occupied or is intended for
occupancy as separate living quarters where the occupant or intended
occupant:
(1) does not live and eat with any other individual in the building;
and
(2) has direct access to the occupant's living quarters from the
outside of the building or through a common hall.
The term includes any other form of dwelling accommodation that
the township trustee determines is safe, decent, and sanitary.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), "shelter", for purposes of
IC 12-20-17-2, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-20-17-2.
2026 IN 108—LS 6368/DI 148